District of Columbia statutes.
7-245

Civil penalties for unlawful use or disclosure.

(a)

(1)

A person who negligently uses or discloses health and human services information in a manner not authorized by this chapter or other District law shall be liable in an amount of $500 for each violation.

(2)

For the purposes of this subsection, the term “negligently” means that a person guided by ordinary considerations should have known, and by exercising reasonable diligence would have known, that the use or disclosure was not authorized.

(b)

A person who willfully uses or discloses health and human services information in a manner not authorized by this chapter or other District law shall be liable in an amount of $1,000 for each violation.

(c)

This section shall not apply to disclosures of information authorized pursuant to other District law or to federal law.

History

Dec. 4, 2010, D.C. Law 18-273, § 105, 57 DCR 7171
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 53(a), 59 DCR 6190

Effect of Amendments

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 validated a previously made technical correction.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 105 of Data-Sharing and Information Coordination Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-530, August 6, 2010, 57 DCR 8099).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 105 of Data-Sharing and Information Coordination Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-582, October 20, 2010, 57 DCR 10118).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 211(b) of Data-Sharing and Information Coordination Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-582, October 20, 2010, 57 DCR 10118).